Hawaii statutes.
§157-32 Standards to determine minimum
prices. (a) As a guide to determining the minimum prices of milk to be
paid to producers and producer-distributors, the board shall take into
consideration the following items based on the operations of a reasonably
efficient producer:

(1) The price to producers necessary to assure the
production of an adequate supply of wholesome milk for the market.

(2) The price necessary to return to the producer,
the producer's cost of production, plus a fair return on the producer's
invested capital, the producer's family labor and the producer's management
skills.

(3) The costs incurred in obtaining, feeding,
managing and maintaining dairy animals at optimum production capacity.

(4) The prevailing wages and perquisites of
employees.

(5) The ordinary fixed charges and operating expenses
incident to the ownership, operation and management of the dairy.

(b) In establishing minimum prices for milk
under this chapter, the board shall further consider the effect thereof on the
consumer. [L 1967, c 260, §21; HRS §157-32; ree and am L 1972, c 40, pt of §2;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next